Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-932
Process for resolving violations; appeal.

The department shall establish a process by rule and regulation for resolving any violation by a self-funded insurer of section 68-928 and for assessing the financial penalties contained in section 68-930. Any appeal of an action by the department under such policies shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2005, LB 589, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,2005, § 68-10,106;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 32;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 260.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.